Alaska statutes. Title 8. Business and Professions.
Article 7. General Provisions.

Sec. 08.68.800.
Exceptions to application of chapter.

This chapter does not apply to

a qualified nurse licensed in another state employed by the United States government or a bureau, or agency, or division of the United States government while in the discharge of official duties;

nursing service given temporarily in the event of a public emergency, epidemic, or disaster;

the practice of nursing by a student enrolled in a nursing education program accredited by the board when the practice is in connection with the student’s course of study;

the practice of nursing by an individual enrolled in an approved program or course of study approved by the board to satisfy the requirements of AS

08.68.251

;

the practice of nursing by a nurse licensed in another state who engages in nursing education or nursing consultation activities, if these activities and contact with clients do not exceed 20 working days within a licensing period; or

the practice of nursing by a nurse licensed in another state whose employment responsibilities include transporting patients into, out of, or through this state; however, this exception is valid for a period not to exceed 48 hours for each transport.

In this section, the word “nurses” includes registered and practical nurses, and “nursing” means registered and practical nursing.

History.

(art IX ch 90 SLA 1957; am § 10 ch 129 SLA 1974; am § 24 ch 14 SLA 1982; am § 14 ch 55 SLA 1987)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS

08.68.400

.
Renumbered in 2010.

Sec. 08.68.805.
Delegation of nursing functions.

A registered, advanced practice registered, or practical nurse licensed under this chapter may delegate nursing duties to other persons, including unlicensed assistive personnel, under regulations adopted by the board. A person to whom the nursing duties are delegated may perform the delegated duties without a license or certificate under this chapter if the person meets the applicable requirements established by the board.

History.

(§ 6 ch 97 SLA 2002; am § 20 ch 33 SLA 2016)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS

08.68.405

.
Renumbered in 2010.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2016 amendment, effective July 7, 2016, inserted “, advanced practice registered,” following “registered”.

Sec. 08.68.850.
Definitions.

In this chapter,

“advanced practice registered nurse” means a registered nurse licensed to practice in the state who, because of specialized education and experience, is certified to perform acts of medical diagnosis and the prescription and dispensing of medical, therapeutic, or corrective measures under regulations adopted by the board;

“board” means the Board of Nursing;

“certified nurse aide” is a person who is certified as a nurse aide by the board;

“incompetent” means that a nurse does not possess the skills, knowledge, and awareness of the nurse’s limitations and abilities to safely practice nursing;

“licensed practical nurse” is equivalent to the title “licensed vocational nurse” and to the name suffix abbreviations L.P.N. and L.V.N.;

“licensed registered nurse” is equivalent to the common title “registered nurse” and the name suffix abbreviation R.N.;

[Repealed, § 60 ch 33 SLA 2016.]

“opioid” includes the opium and opiate substances and opium and opiate derivatives listed in AS

11.71.140

and

11.71.160

;

“practice of advanced practice registered nursing” includes, in addition to the practice of registered nursing, the performance of acts of medical diagnosis and the prescription and dispensing of medical, therapeutic, or corrective measures under regulations adopted by the board;

“practice of practical nursing” means the performance for compensation or personal profit of nursing functions that do not require the substantial specialized skill, judgment, and knowledge of a registered nurse;

“practice of registered nursing” means the performance for compensation or personal profit of acts of professional service that requires substantial specialized knowledge, judgment, and skill based on the principles of biological, physiological, behavioral, and sociological sciences in assessing and responding to the health needs of individuals, families, or communities through services that include

assessment of problems, counseling, and teaching

clients to maintain health or prevent illness; and

in the care of the ill, injured, or infirm;

administration, supervision, delegation, and evaluation of nursing practice;

teaching others the skills of nursing;

execution of a medical regimen as prescribed by a person authorized by the state to practice medicine;

performance of other acts that require education and training that are recognized by the nursing profession as properly performed by registered nurses;

performance of acts of medical diagnosis and the prescription of medical therapeutic or corrective measures under regulations adopted by the board;

“unlicensed assistive personnel” means persons, such as orderlies, assistants, attendants, technicians, members of a nursing client’s immediate family, or the guardian of a nursing client, who are not licensed to practice practical nursing, registered nursing, medicine, or any other health occupation that requires a license in this state.

History.

(§ 2 ch 90 SLA 1957; am § 5 ch 37 SLA 1970; am § 3 ch 67 SLA 1973; am §§ 11, 12 ch 129 SLA 1974; am § 25 ch 14 SLA 1982; am § 1 ch 3 SLA 1993; am § 6 ch 2 SLA 1998; am § 7 ch 97 SLA 2002; am §§
21, 22, 60 ch 33 SLA 2016; am § 23 ch 2 SSSLA 2017)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly
AS

08.68.410

.
Renumbered in 2010.

Reorganized in 2002, 2016, and 2017 to maintain alphabetical order. Paragraph (9) was enacted as (11) and renumbered in 2016 and 2017.

Paragraph (8) was enacted as (12) and renumbered in 2017.

Administrative Code. —

For examinations and licensure, see 12 AAC 44, art. 3.

For advanced nurse practitioner, see 12 AAC 44, art. 4.

For registered nurse anesthetists, see 12 AAC 44, art. 5.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2016 amendment, effective July 7, 2016, in (1), substituted “practice registered nurse” for “nurse practitioner” following “advanced”; substituted “licensed” for “authorized”; repealed (7); added (11).

The 2017 amendment, effective July 26, 2017, added (12) [now (8)].